Washington statutes.
RCW 19.310.060

Duties of exchange facilitator—Errors and omissions policies.

(1) A person who engages in business as an exchange facilitator shall:

(a) Maintain a policy of errors and omissions insurance in an amount of not less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars executed by an insurer authorized to do business in this state; or

(b) Deposit an amount of cash or securities or irrevocable letters of credit in an amount of not less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars into an interest-bearing deposit account or a money market account with the financial institution of the exchange facilitator's choice. Interest on that amount accrues to the exchange facilitator.

(2) A person who engages in business as an exchange facilitator may maintain insurance or deposit an amount of cash or securities or irrevocable letters of credit in excess of the minimum required amounts under this section.

(3) The requirements under subsection (1)(a) of this section are satisfied if the person engaging in business as an exchange facilitator is listed as a named insured on one or more errors and omissions policies that have an aggregate total of at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars.

(4) An exchange facilitator must provide evidence to each client that the requirements of this section are satisfied before entering into an exchange agreement.

(5) Upon request of a current or prospective client, or the attorney general under chapter 19.86 RCW, the exchange facilitator must offer evidence proving that the requirements of this section are satisfied at the time of the request.

[ 2009 c 70 s 7.]